algorithms/amharic.sbl
// Normalizations
define Normalize_pre as (
    do repeat (
        (
            [substring] among (
                '{aan}' '{uun}' '{iin}' '{aa}' '{uu}' '{ii}' '{oo}' '{~}'( delete ) // strip vocalization
                '{_}' ( delete ) // strip kasheeda

                // Ethiopic numerals
                '{0}' ( <- '0')
                '{1}' ( <- '1')
                '{2}' ( <- '2')
                '{3}' ( <- '3')
                '{4}' ( <- '4')
                '{5}' ( <- '5')
                '{6}' ( <- '6')
                '{7}' ( <- '7')
                '{8}' ( <- '8')
                '{9}' ( <- '9')

                // Shaped forms
                '{o1}' ( <- '{o}' ) // HAMZA
                '{ao1}' '{ao2}'  ( <- '{ao}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
                '{ao_1}' '{ao_2}' ( <- '{ao_}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
                '{yo1}'  '{yo2}' '{yo3}'  '{yo4}'  ( <- '{yo}' ) // YEH_HAMZA
                '{a~1}'  '{a~2}'( <- '{a~}' ) // ALEF_MADDA
                '{wo1}' '{wo2}'( <- '{wo}' ) // WAW_HAMZA
                '{a1}' '{a2}' ( <- '{a}' ) // ALEF
                '{b1}' '{b2}' '{b3}'  '{b4}'  ( <- '{b}' ) // BEH
                '{t_1}'  '{t_2}' ( <- '{t_}' ) // TEH_MARBUTA
                '{t1}'   '{t2}' '{t3}' '{t4}'  ( <- '{t}' ) // TEH
                '{th1}' '{th2}' '{th3}' '{th4}' ( <- '{th}' ) // THEH
                '{j1}' '{j2}'  '{j3}' '{j4}'(  <- '{j}' ) // JEEM
                '{h1}' '{h2}' '{h3}' '{h4}' ( <- '{h}' ) // HAH
                '{x1}' '{x2}' '{x3}' '{x4}'( <- '{x}' ) // KHAH
                '{d1}'  '{d2}'  ( <- '{d}' ) // DAL
                '{dz1}''{dz2}' ( <- '{dz}' ) // THAL
                '{r1}' '{r2}'( <- '{r}' ) // REH
                '{z1}' '{z2}'  ( <- '{z}' ) // ZAIN
                '{s1}'  '{s2}'   '{s3}' '{s4}'( <- '{s}' ) // SEEN
                '{sh1}' '{sh2}' '{sh3}' '{sh4}' ( <- '{sh}' ) // SHEEN
                '{c1}' '{c2}' '{c3}' '{c4}'( <- '{c}' ) // SAD
                '{dh1}'    '{dh2}'   '{dh3}'  '{dh4}'( <- '{dh}' ) // DAD
                '{tt1}'  '{tt2}'  '{tt3}'  '{tt4}' ( <- '{tt}' ) // TAH
                '{zh1}' '{zh2}' '{zh3}'    '{zh4}'( <- '{zh}' ) // ZAH
                '{i1}' '{i2}' '{i3}'  '{i4}'( <- '{i}' ) // AIN
                '{gh1}' '{gh2}' '{gh3}'  '{gh4}'( <- '{gh}' ) // GHAIN
                '{f1}'  '{f2}' '{f3}'  '{f4}' ( <- '{f}' ) // FEH
                '{q1}' '{q2}' '{q3}' '{q4}' ( <- '{q}' ) // QAF
                '{k1}' '{k2}' '{k3}'  '{k4}'( <- '{k}' ) // KAF
                '{l1}' '{l2}' '{l3}' '{l4}'( <- '{l}' ) // LAM
                '{m1}' '{m2}'  '{m3}' '{m4}'   ( <- '{m}' ) // MEEM
                '{n1}'  '{n2}' '{n3}'  '{n4}'( <- '{n}' ) // NOON
                '{e1}' '{e2}' '{e3}' '{e4}' ( <- '{e}' ) // HEH
                '{w1}'  '{w2}'  ( <- '{w}' ) // WAW
                '{a_1}' '{a_2}' ( <- '{a_}' ) // ALEF_MAKSURA
                '{y1}' '{y2}' '{y3}' '{y4}' ( <- '{y}' ) // YEH

                // Ligatures Lam-Alef
                '{la}'  '{la2}'     (<- '{l}{a}')
                '{lao}'  '{lao2}'   (<- '{l}{ao}')
                '{lao_}'  '{lao_2}' (<- '{l}{ao_}')
                '{la~}'  '{la~2}'    (<- '{l}{a~}')

            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)

define Normalize_post as (

    do (
        // normalize last hamza
        backwards (
        [substring] among (
            '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{o}')
        '{wo}' ( <- '{o}')
        '{yo}' ( <- '{o}')
        )
        )
    )

    do repeat (
        (
        // normalize other hamza's
            [substring] among (
                '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{a}')
                '{wo}' ( <- '{w}')
                '{yo}' ( <- '{y}')
            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)

// Checks
define Checks1 as (
    [substring] among (
        '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($(len > 4)  set is_noun  unset is_verb set is_defined)
        '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($(len > 3)  set is_noun unset is_verb set is_defined)
    )
)


//prefixes
define Prefix_Step1 as (
         [substring] among (
             '{ao}{ao}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{ao}'  )
             '{ao}{a~}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{a~}'  )
             '{ao}{wo}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{ao}'  )
             '{ao}{a}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{a}'  )
             '{ao}{ao_}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{ao_}'  )
            // '{ao}' ($(len > 3) delete) //rare case
        )
)

define Prefix_Step2 as (
        not '{f}{a}'
        not '{w}{a}'
        [substring] among (
            '{f}' ($(len > 3) delete)
            '{w}' ($(len > 3) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3a_Noun as ( // it is noun and defined
        [substring] among (
            '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($(len > 5) delete)
            '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($(len > 4) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3b_Noun as ( // probably  noun and defined
        not '{b}{a}' // exception
        [substring] among (
            '{b}' ($(len > 3) delete)
            // '{k}'  '{l}' ($(len > 3) delete) // BUG: cause confusion
            '{b}{b}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{b}'  )
            '{k}{k}'  ($(len > 3) <-  '{k}'  )
           )

)

define Prefix_Step3_Verb as (
        [substring] among (
            //'{s}' ($(len > 4) delete)// BUG: cause confusion
            '{s}{y}' ($(len > 4) <- '{y}' )
            '{s}{t}' ($(len > 4) <- '{t}')
            '{s}{n}' ($(len > 4) <- '{n}')
            '{s}{ao}' ($(len > 4) <- '{ao}')
        )
)

define Prefix_Step4_Verb as (
        [substring] among (
            '{y}{s}{t}' '{n}{s}{t}' '{t}{s}{t}' ($(len > 4) set is_verb unset is_noun <-  '{a}{s}{t}' )
        )
)

// suffixes
backwardmode (

        define Suffix_Noun_Step1a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{y}' '{k}' '{e}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{k}{m}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{m}' ($(len >= 5)  delete)
                        '{k}{m}{a}' '{e}{m}{a}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step1b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{n}' ($(len > 5) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{a}' '{y}' '{w}' ($(len > 4) delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{a}{t}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c1 as (
            [substring] among (
                '{t}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c2 as ( // feminine t_
            [substring] among (
                '{t_}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step3 as ( // ya' nisbiya
            [substring] among (
                '{y}' ($(len >= 3) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step1 as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{e}' '{k}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{y}' '{n}{a}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{m}' '{e}{n}' '{k}{m}' '{k}{n}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
                        '{e}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{w}'($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Verb_Step2a as (
                [substring] among (
                       '{t}' ($(len >= 4)  delete)
                        '{a}' '{n}' '{y}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{t}{a}'  '{t}{n}'  ($(len >= 5) delete)// past
                        '{a}{n}' '{w}{n}' '{y}{n}' ($(len > 5) delete) // present
                        '{t}{m}{a}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step2b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{w}{a}' '{t}{m}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
            )
        )


        define Suffix_Verb_Step2c as (
            [substring] among (
                '{w}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                '{t}{m}{w}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_All_alef_maqsura as (
            [substring] among (
                '{a_}' ( <- '{y}' ) // spell error
                // '{a_}' ( delete ) // if noun > 3
                // '{a_}' ( <- '{a}') // if verb
            )
        )
)

define stem as (
    // set initial values
    set is_noun
    set is_verb
    unset is_defined

    // guess type and properties
    do Checks1

    // normalization pre-stemming
    do Normalize_pre


    backwards (

       do (
              //Suffixes for verbs
            (
           is_verb
           (
               (
                  (atleast 1 Suffix_Verb_Step1)
                  ( Suffix_Verb_Step2a or Suffix_Verb_Step2c  or next)
                )
                or Suffix_Verb_Step2b
                or Suffix_Verb_Step2a
            )
           )
            //Suffixes for nouns
          or (
               is_noun
                (

                 try (
                     Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
                     or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step1a (
                            Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
                            or next))
                     or (Suffix_Noun_Step1b (
                            Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                            or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1))
                     or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step2a)
                     or (Suffix_Noun_Step2b)
                 )
                 Suffix_Noun_Step3
                 )

            )

            // Suffixes for alef maqsura
            or  Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
        )
    )

    //Prefixes
    do (
       try Prefix_Step1
       try Prefix_Step2
       ( Prefix_Step3a_Noun
         or (is_noun Prefix_Step3b_Noun)
         or (is_verb try Prefix_Step3_Verb Prefix_Step4_Verb)
         )
    )

    // normalization post-stemming
    do Normalize_post

)
